Massachusetts, session 194th, S782.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 16 of chapter 12C of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding at the end thereof the following subsection:-
(d) The center, as part of its annual report, shall evaluate and report on individual carrier
data metrics submitted to the center pursuant to subsection (b), clauses (1) through (5) of section
10 of chapter 12C as well as data submitted to the Division of Insurance under section 6 of
Chapter 176J and section 21 of chapter 176O. The center shall issue public reports on carrier
data periodically, including through its annual report.
SECTION 2: Section 6 of chapter 176J of the General Laws, appearing in the 2018 2
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end of subsection (b) the following
sentence:- "The commissioner shall make all information submitted to the division pursuant to
of 2

the provisions of this subsection publicly available on a website in an easily readable and
understandable format on an annual basis.".
of 2